North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8. Evidence.
Article 14. Chain of Custody.

§ 8-103.
Courier service and contract carriers.

For purposes of maintaining a chain of custody for any item of evidence, depositing the item with the State courier service operated by the Department of Administration or a common or contract carrier shall be considered the same as depositing such item in first class United States mail.

History.

1983, c. 375, s. 1.

§§ 8-104 through 8-109.

Reserved for future codification purposes.